California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(e) The commission shall meet at the call of the commission chairperson or at the request of the majority of the commission members. A majority of the commission members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action shall be taken by the commission except by the recorded vote of a majority of the full membership. 

(f) The commission may establish a schedule of fees necessary to comply with this article. Those fees shall be charged to the proponents of actions, regulations, or permits, shall not exceed the estimated reasonable cost of providing the service, and shall be imposed pursuant to Section 66016 of the Government Code. Except as provided in subdivision (g), after June 30, 1991, a commission that has not adopted the airport land use compatibility plan required by Section 21675 shall not charge fees pursuant to this subdivision until the commission adopts the plan.

(g) In any county that has undertaken by contract or otherwise completed airport land use compatibility plans for at least one-half of all public use airports in the county, the commission may continue to charge fees necessary to comply with this article until June 30, 1992, and, if the airport land use compatibility plans are complete by that date, may continue charging fees after June 30, 1992. If the airport land use compatibility plans are not complete by June 30, 1992, the commission shall not charge fees pursuant to subdivision (f) until the commission adopts the land use plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21672.

Each commission shall adopt rules and regulations with respect to the temporary disqualification of its members from participating in the review or adoption of a proposal because of conflict of interest and with respect to appointment of substitute members in such cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

21673.

In any county not having a commission or a body designated to carry out the responsibilities of a commission, any owner of a public airport may initiate proceedings for the creation of a commission by presenting a request to the board of supervisors that a commission be created and showing the need therefor to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1018, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

21674.

The commission has the following powers and duties, subject to the limitations upon its jurisdiction set forth in Section 21676:

(a) To assist local agencies in ensuring compatible land uses in the vicinity of all new airports and in the vicinity of existing airports to the extent that the land in the vicinity of those airports is not already devoted to incompatible uses.

(b) To coordinate planning at the state, regional, and local levels so as to provide for the orderly development of air transportation, while at the same time protecting the public health, safety, and welfare.

(c) To prepare and adopt an airport land use compatibility plan pursuant to Section 21675.

(d) To review the plans, regulations, and other actions of local agencies and airport operators pursuant to Section 21676.

(e) The powers of the commission shall in no way be construed to give the commission jurisdiction over the operation of any airport.

(f) In order to carry out its responsibilities, the commission may adopt rules and regulations consistent with this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21674.5.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall develop and implement a program or programs to assist in the training and development of the staff of airport land use commissions, after consulting with airport land use commissions, cities, counties, and other appropriate public entities.

(b) The training and development program or programs are intended to assist the staff of airport land use commissions in addressing high priority needs, and may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) The establishment of a process for the development and adoption of airport land use compatibility plans.

(2) The development of criteria for determining the airport influence area.

(3) The identification of essential elements that should be included in the airport land use compatibility plans.

(4) Appropriate criteria and procedures for reviewing proposed developments and determining whether proposed developments are compatible with the airport use.

(5) Any other organizational, operational, procedural, or technical responsibilities and functions that the department determines to be appropriate to provide to commission staff and for which it determines there is a need for staff training or development.

(c) The department may provide training and development programs for airport land use commission staff pursuant to this section by any means it deems appropriate. Those programs may be presented in any of the following ways:

(1) By offering formal courses or training programs.

(2) By sponsoring or assisting in the organization and sponsorship of conferences, seminars, or other similar events.

(3) By producing and making available written information.

(4) Any other feasible method of providing information and assisting in the training and development of airport land use commission staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21674.7.

(a) An airport land use commission that formulates, adopts, or amends an airport land use compatibility plan shall be guided by information prepared and updated pursuant to Section 21674.5 and referred to as the Airport Land Use Planning Handbook published by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to discourage incompatible land uses near existing airports. Therefore, prior to granting permits for the renovation or remodeling of an existing building, structure, or facility, and before the construction of a new building, it is the intent of the Legislature that local agencies shall be guided by the height, use, noise, safety, and density criteria that are compatible with airport operations, as established by this article, and referred to as the Airport Land Use Planning Handbook, published by the division, and any applicable federal aviation regulations, including, but not limited to, Part 77 (commencing with Section 77.1) of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, to the extent that the criteria has been incorporated into the plan prepared by a commission pursuant to Section 21675. This subdivision does not limit the jurisdiction of a commission as established by this article. This subdivision does not limit the authority of local agencies to overrule commission actions or recommendations pursuant to Sections 21676, 21676.5, or 21677.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21675.

(a) Each commission shall formulate an airport land use compatibility plan that will provide for the orderly growth of each public airport and the area surrounding the airport within the jurisdiction of the commission, and will safeguard the general welfare of the inhabitants within the vicinity of the airport and the public in general. The commission’s airport land use compatibility plan shall include and shall be based on a long-range master plan or an airport layout plan, as determined by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, that reflects the anticipated growth of the airport during at least the next 20 years. In formulating an airport land use compatibility plan, the commission may develop height restrictions on buildings, specify use of land, and determine building standards, including soundproofing adjacent to airports, within the airport influence area. The airport land use compatibility plan shall be reviewed as often as necessary in order to accomplish its purposes, but shall not be amended more than once in any calendar year.

(b) The commission shall include, within its airport land use compatibility plan formulated pursuant to subdivision (a), the area within the jurisdiction of the commission surrounding any military airport for all of the purposes specified in subdivision (a). The airport land use compatibility plan shall be consistent with the safety and noise standards in the Air Installation Compatible Use Zone prepared for that military airport. This subdivision does not give the commission any jurisdiction or authority over the territory or operations of any military airport.

(c) The airport influence area shall be established by the commission after hearing and consultation with the involved agencies.

(d) The commission shall submit to the Division of Aeronautics of the department one copy of the airport land use compatibility plan and each amendment to the plan.

(e) If an airport land use compatibility plan does not include the matters required to be included pursuant to this article, the Division of Aeronautics of the department shall notify the commission responsible for the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21675.1.

(a) By June 30, 1991, each commission shall adopt the airport land use compatibility plan required pursuant to Section 21675, except that any county that has undertaken by contract or otherwise completed airport land use compatibility plans for at least one-half of all public use airports in the county, shall adopt that airport land use compatibility plan on or before June 30, 1992.

(b) Until a commission adopts an airport land use compatibility plan, a city or county shall first submit all actions, regulations, and permits within the vicinity of a public airport to the commission for review and approval. Before the commission approves or disapproves any actions, regulations, or permits, the commission shall give public notice in the same manner as the city or county is required to give for those actions, regulations, or permits. As used in this section, “vicinity” means land that will be included or reasonably could be included within the airport land use compatibility plan. If the commission has not designated an airport influence area for the airport land use compatibility plan, then “vicinity” means land within two miles of the boundary of a public airport.

(c) The commission may approve an action, regulation, or permit if it finds, based on substantial evidence in the record, all of the following:

(1) The commission is making substantial progress toward the completion of the airport land use compatibility plan.

(2) There is a reasonable probability that the action, regulation, or permit will be consistent with the airport land use compatibility plan being prepared by the commission.

(3) There is little or no probability of substantial detriment to or interference with the future adopted airport land use compatibility plan if the action, regulation, or permit is ultimately inconsistent with the airport land use compatibility plan.

(d) If the commission disapproves an action, regulation, or permit, the commission shall notify the city or county. The city or county may overrule the commission, by a two-thirds vote of its governing body, if it makes specific findings that the proposed action, regulation, or permit is consistent with the purposes of this article, as stated in Section 21670.

(e) If a city or county overrules the commission pursuant to subdivision (d), that action shall not relieve the city or county from further compliance with this article after the commission adopts the airport land use compatibility plan.

(f) If a city or county overrules the commission pursuant to subdivision (d) with respect to a publicly owned airport that the city or county does not operate, the operator of the airport is not liable for damages to property or personal injury resulting from the city’s or county’s decision to proceed with the action, regulation, or permit.

(g) A commission may adopt rules and regulations that exempt any ministerial permit for single-family dwellings from the requirements of subdivision (b) if it makes the findings required pursuant to subdivision (c) for the proposed rules and regulations, except that the rules and regulations may not exempt either of the following:

(1) More than two single-family dwellings by the same applicant within a subdivision prior to June 30, 1991.

(2) Single-family dwellings in a subdivision where 25 percent or more of the parcels are undeveloped.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21675.2.

(a) If a commission fails to act to approve or disapprove any actions, regulations, or permits within 60 days of receiving the request pursuant to Section 21675.1, the applicant or his or her representative may file an action pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure to compel the commission to act, and the court shall give the proceedings preference over all other actions or proceedings, except previously filed pending matters of the same character.

(b) The action, regulation, or permit shall be deemed approved only if the public notice required by this subdivision has occurred. If the applicant has provided seven days advance notice to the commission of the intent to provide public notice pursuant to this subdivision, then, not earlier than the date of the expiration of the time limit established by Section 21675.1, an applicant may provide the required public notice. If the applicant chooses to provide public notice, that notice shall include a description of the proposed action, regulation, or permit substantially similar to the descriptions which are commonly used in public notices by the commission, the location of any proposed development, the application number, the name and address of the commission, and a statement that the action, regulation, or permit shall be deemed approved if the commission has not acted within 60 days. If the applicant has provided the public notice specified in this subdivision, the time limit for action by the commission shall be extended to 60 days after the public notice is provided. If the applicant provides notice pursuant to this section, the commission shall refund to the applicant any fees which were collected for providing notice and which were not used for that purpose.

(c) Failure of an applicant to submit complete or adequate information pursuant to Sections 65943 to 65946, inclusive, of the Government Code, may constitute grounds for disapproval of actions, regulations, or permits.

(d) Nothing in this section diminishes the commission’s legal responsibility to provide, where applicable, public notice and hearing before acting on an action, regulation, or permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 306, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

21676.

(a) Each local agency whose general plan includes areas covered by an airport land use compatibility plan shall, by July 1, 1983, submit a copy of its plan or specific plans to the airport land use commission. The commission shall determine by August 31, 1983, whether the plan or plans are consistent or inconsistent with the airport land use compatibility plan. If the plan or plans are inconsistent with the airport land use compatibility plan, the local agency shall be notified and that local agency shall have another hearing to reconsider its airport land use compatibility plans. The local agency may propose to overrule the commission after the hearing by a two-thirds vote of its governing body if it makes specific findings that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670. At least 45 days prior to the decision to overrule the commission, the local agency governing body shall provide the commission and the division a copy of the proposed decision and findings. The commission and the division may provide comments to the local agency governing body within 30 days of receiving the proposed decision and findings. If the commission or the division’s comments are not available within this time limit, the local agency governing body may act without them. The comments by the division or the commission are advisory to the local agency governing body. The local agency governing body shall include comments from the commission and the division in the final record of any final decision to overrule the commission, which may only be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing body.

(b) Prior to the amendment of a general plan or specific plan, or the adoption or approval of a zoning ordinance or building regulation within the planning boundary established by the airport land use commission pursuant to Section 21675, the local agency shall first refer the proposed action to the commission. If the commission determines that the proposed action is inconsistent with the commission’s plan, the referring agency shall be notified. The local agency may, after a public hearing, propose to overrule the commission by a two-thirds vote of its governing body if it makes specific findings that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670. At least 45 days prior to the decision to overrule the commission, the local agency governing body shall provide the commission and the division a copy of the proposed decision and findings. The commission and the division may provide comments to the local agency governing body within 30 days of receiving the proposed decision and findings. If the commission or the division’s comments are not available within this time limit, the local agency governing body may act without them. The comments by the division or the commission are advisory to the local agency governing body. The local agency governing body shall include comments from the commission and the division in the public record of any final decision to overrule the commission, which may only be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing body.

(c) Each public agency owning any airport within the boundaries of an airport land use compatibility plan shall, prior to modification of its airport master plan, refer any proposed change to the airport land use commission. If the commission determines that the proposed action is inconsistent with the commission’s plan, the referring agency shall be notified. The public agency may, after a public hearing, propose to overrule the commission by a two-thirds vote of its governing body if it makes specific findings that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670. At least 45 days prior to the decision to overrule the commission, the public agency governing body shall provide the commission and the division a copy of the proposed decision and findings. The commission and the division may provide comments to the public agency governing body within 30 days of receiving the proposed decision and findings. If the commission or the division’s comments are not available within this time limit, the public agency governing body may act without them. The comments by the division or the commission are advisory to the public agency governing body. The public agency governing body shall include comments from the commission and the division in the final decision to overrule the commission, which may only be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing body.

(d) Each commission determination pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) shall be made within 60 days from the date of referral of the proposed action. If a commission fails to make the determination within that period, the proposed action shall be deemed consistent with the airport land use compatibility plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21676.5.

(a) If the commission finds that a local agency has not revised its general plan or specific plan or overruled the commission by a two-thirds vote of its governing body after making specific findings that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article as stated in Section 21670, the commission may require that the local agency submit all subsequent actions, regulations, and permits to the commission for review until its general plan or specific plan is revised or the specific findings are made. If, in the determination of the commission, an action, regulation, or permit of the local agency is inconsistent with the airport land use compatibility plan, the local agency shall be notified and that local agency shall hold a hearing to reconsider its plan. The local agency may propose to overrule the commission after the hearing by a two-thirds vote of its governing body if it makes specific findings that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article as stated in Section 21670. At least 45 days prior to the decision to overrule the commission, the local agency governing body shall provide the commission and the division a copy of the proposed decision and findings. The commission and the division may provide comments to the local agency governing body within 30 days of receiving the proposed decision and findings. If the commission or the division’s comments are not available within this time limit, the local agency governing body may act without them. The comments by the division or the commission are advisory to the local agency governing body. The local agency governing body shall include comments from the commission and the division in the final decision to overrule the commission, which may only be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the governing body.

(b) Whenever the local agency has revised its general plan or specific plan or has overruled the commission pursuant to subdivision (a), the proposed action of the local agency shall not be subject to further commission review, unless the commission and the local agency agree that individual projects shall be reviewed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21677.

Notwithstanding the two-thirds vote required by Section 21676, any public agency in the County of Marin may overrule the Marin County Airport Land Use Commission by a majority vote of its governing body. At least 45 days prior to the decision to overrule the commission, the public agency governing body shall provide the commission and the division a copy of the proposed decision and findings. The commission and the division may provide comments to the public agency governing body within 30 days of receiving the proposed decision and findings. If the commission or the division’s comments are not available within this time limit, the public agency governing body may act without them. The comments by the division or the commission are advisory to the public agency governing body. The public agency governing body shall include comments from the commission and the division in the public record of the final decision to overrule the commission, which may be adopted by a majority vote of the governing body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21678.

With respect to a publicly owned airport that a public agency does not operate, if the public agency pursuant to Section 21676, 21676.5, or 21677 overrules a commission’s action or recommendation, the operator of the airport shall be immune from liability for damages to property or personal injury caused by or resulting directly or indirectly from the public agency’s decision to overrule the commission’s action or recommendation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 351, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21679.

(a) In any county in which there is no airport land use commission or other body designated to assume the responsibilities of an airport land use commission, or in which the commission or other designated body has not adopted an airport land use compatibility plan, an interested party may initiate proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to postpone the effective date of a zoning change, a zoning variance, the issuance of a permit, or the adoption of a regulation by a local agency, that directly affects the use of land within one mile of the boundary of a public airport within the county.

(b) The court may issue an injunction that postpones the effective date of the zoning change, zoning variance, permit, or regulation until the governing body of the local agency that took the action does one of the following:

(1) In the case of an action that is a legislative act, adopts a resolution declaring that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670.

(2) In the case of an action that is not a legislative act, adopts a resolution making findings based on substantial evidence in the record that the proposed action is consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670.

(3) Rescinds the action.

(4) Amends its action to make it consistent with the purposes of this article stated in Section 21670, and complies with either paragraph (1) or (2), whichever is applicable.

(c) The court shall not issue an injunction pursuant to subdivision (b) if the local agency that took the action demonstrates that the general plan and any applicable specific plan of the agency accomplishes the purposes of an airport land use compatibility plan as provided in Section 21675.

(d) An action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be commenced within 30 days of the decision or within the appropriate time periods set by Section 21167 of the Public Resources Code, whichever is longer.

(e) If the governing body of the local agency adopts a resolution pursuant to subdivision (b) with respect to a publicly owned airport that the local agency does not operate, the operator of the airport shall be immune from liability for damages to property or personal injury from the local agency’s decision to proceed with the zoning change, zoning variance, permit, or regulation.

(f) As used in this section, “interested party” means any owner of land within two miles of the boundary of the airport or any organization with a demonstrated interest in airport safety and efficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21679.5.

(a) Until June 30, 1991, no action pursuant to Section 21679 to postpone the effective date of a zoning change, a zoning variance, the issuance of a permit, or the adoption of a regulation by a local agency, directly affecting the use of land within one mile of the boundary of a public airport, shall be commenced in any county in which the commission or other designated body has not adopted an airport land use compatibility plan, but is making substantial progress toward the completion of the airport land use compatibility plan.

(b) If a commission has been prevented from adopting the airport land use compatibility plan by June 30, 1991, or if the adopted airport land use compatibility plan could not become effective, because of a lawsuit involving the adoption of the airport land use compatibility plan, the June 30, 1991, date in subdivision (a) shall be extended by the period of time during which the lawsuit was pending in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) Any action pursuant to Section 21679 commenced prior to January 1, 1990, in a county in which the commission or other designated body has not adopted an airport land use compatibility plan, but is making substantial progress toward the completion of the airport land use compatibility plan, which has not proceeded to final judgment, shall be held in abeyance until June 30, 1991. If the commission or other designated body adopts an airport land use compatibility plan on or before June 30, 1991, the action shall be dismissed. If the commission or other designated body does not adopt an airport land use compatibility plan on or before June 30, 1991, the plaintiff or plaintiffs may proceed with the action.

(d) An action to postpone the effective date of a zoning change, a zoning variance, the issuance of a permit, or the adoption of a regulation by a local agency, directly affecting the use of land within one mile of the boundary of a public airport for which an airport land use compatibility plan has not been adopted by June 30, 1991, shall be commenced within 30 days of June 30, 1991, or within 30 days of the decision by the local agency, or within the appropriate time periods set by Section 21167 of the Public Resources Code, whichever date is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Aeronautics Fund [21680. - 21688.]

21680.

(a) The Aeronautics Fund is hereby continued in existence as the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund. The moneys deposited to the credit of the account are continuously appropriated for expenditure by the board and the department as provided in this article.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the Airport Assistance Revolving Fund, the Airport Assistance Fund, or the Aeronautics Fund shall be deemed to refer to the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund. As used in this article, “fund” shall be deemed to refer to the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------

21681.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Own and operate” means that the public entity shall own the property in fee simple or by a long-term lease of a minimum of 20 years, unless otherwise approved by the department, and shall maintain dominion and control of the property, except that the public entity may provide by contract with a person for the operation and management of an airport otherwise meeting the requirements of this article. Operations of the airport shall be for, and on behalf of, the public entity. All leases to the public entity of property are required to be approved by the department. A lease of the property by the public entity to an agent or agency other than to a public entity does not meet the criteria for participation in airport assistance funds.

(b) “Matching funds” means money that is provided by the public entity and does not consist of funds previously received from state or federal agencies or public entity funds previously used to match federal or state funds. This definition shall be retroactive to July 1, 1967.

(c) “General aviation” means all aviation except air carrier and military aviation.

(d) “Public entity” means any city, county, airport district, airport authority, port district, port authority, public district, public authority, political subdivision, airport land use commission, community services district, or public corporation and the University of California.

(e) “Public agency” means the various agencies of the State of California and the federal government.

(f) “Airport and aviation purposes” means expenditures of a capital improvement nature, including the repair or replacement of a capital improvement, and expenditures for compatible land use planning in the area surrounding an airport, for any of the following purposes:

(1) Land acquisition for development and improvement of general aviation aircraft landing facilities.

(2) Grading and drainage necessary for the construction or reconstruction of runways or taxiways.

(3) Construction or reconstruction of runways or taxiways.

(4) Acquisition of “runway protection zones” as defined in Federal Aviation Administration Advisory Circular 150/1500-13.

(5) Acquisition of easements through, or other interests in, airspace as may be reasonably required for safeguarding aircraft operations in the vicinity of an aircraft landing facility.

(6) Removal of natural obstructions from runway protection zones.

(7) Installation of “segmented circle airport marker systems” as defined in current regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration.

(8) Installation of runway, taxiway, boundary, or obstruction lights, together with directly related electrical equipment.

(9) Installation of minimum security fencing around the perimeter of an aircraft landing facility.

(10) Grading and drainage necessary to provide for parking of transient general aviation aircraft.

(11) Construction or reconstruction of transient general aviation aircraft parking areas.

(12) Servicing of revenue or general obligation bonds issued to finance capital improvements for airport and aviation purposes.

(13) Air navigational facilities.

(14) Engineering and preliminary engineering related directly to a project funded under this article.

(15) Other capital improvements as may be designated in rules and regulations adopted by the department.

(16) Activities of an airport land use commission in connection with the preparation of a new or updated airport land use compatibility plan pursuant to Section 21675. Expenditures that cannot be clearly identified as capital improvements shall be submitted to the department for consideration and approval.

(17) Airport master plans and airport layout plans.

(g) “Operation and maintenance” means expenditures for wages or salaries, utilities, service vehicles, and all other noncapital expenditures that are included in insurance, professional services, supplies, construction equipment, upkeep and landscaping, and other items of expenditure designated as “operation and maintenance” in rules and regulations adopted by the department.

(h) “Enplanement” means the boarding of an aircraft by a revenue passenger, including an original, stopover, or transfer boarding of the aircraft. For purposes of this subdivision, a stopover is a deliberate and intentional interruption of a journey by a passenger scheduled to exceed four hours in the case of an intrastate or interstate passenger or not to exceed 24 hours in the case of an international passenger at a point between the point of departure and the point of destination, and a transfer is an occurrence at an intermediate point in an itinerary whereby a passenger or shipment changes from a flight of one carrier to another flight either of the same or a different carrier with or without a stopover.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 438, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21682.

(a) The department shall establish individual revolving fund subaccounts for eligible airports in the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund. Money payable under this section shall be credited to individual airport subaccounts annually, and may be accumulated for a maximum period of five years.

(b) The department shall, subject to Section 21684, credit from the Aeronautics Account to each public entity owning and operating an airport or airports under a valid permit issued by the department for every airport which has not been designated by the Federal Aviation Administration as (1) a reliever airport, as defined in Section 503 (a) (19) of the federal Airport and Airway Improvement Act of 1982, as amended, or (2) a commercial service airport, as defined in Section 503 (a) (5) of the federal Airport and Airway Improvement Act of 1982, as amended, the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually for each qualifying airport. These funds shall be paid to public entities upon request for expenditure on preapproved eligible projects. Eligible public entities may submit applications for the withdrawal of credited funds for expenditure on proposed projects in letter form to the department for review and approval. Projects identified shall be for airport and aviation purposes and operation and maintenance purposes. No payment made under this section is transferable, but shall be expended only upon the airport for which the payment is made, unless the department authorizes a payment to be transferred for expenditure on another airport owned or operated by the public entity. The department may establish any accounting systems it deems necessary to provide for the cumulation and expenditure of funds under this subdivision.

(c) If, in any year, there is insufficient money in the Aeronautics Account to make the credits specified in subdivision (b), the department shall, subject to Section 21684, credit to each public entity subaccount an amount which is equal to the total amount of money in the Aeronautics Account multiplied by a percentage equivalent to the proportion which the airport or airports of the public entity for which credit is required to be made pursuant to subdivision (b) bear to the total number of airports for which credit is required to be made pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) No payment shall be made under this section to any public entity for any airport on which general or commercial aviation activities are substantially restricted if the airport is licensed to conduct these activities by the department. The department shall determine whether or not general or commercial aviation activities are restricted.

(e) The department shall adopt rules and regulations and establish procedures to effect prompt payment to public entities for eligible airport projects from money credited pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 671, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21682.5.

The department shall pay, from the Aeronautics Account to the Transportation Planning and Development Account in the State Transportation Fund, a sum equal to the pro rata share of the comprehensive transportation duties attributable to aviation planning and research, as determined by the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

21683.

Any public entity may apply to the department each year for the allocation of funds for the acquisition or development of airports. The commission may, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department, make an allocation to the public entity if it determines that the proposed acquisition or development is feasible and in accordance with the policies and standards established by the department. The department shall make recommendations to the commission on all applications. Such allocations shall be represented as subventions in the department budget in accordance with Section 21206.

No moneys paid under this section shall be expended for operation and maintenance. No payment shall be made under this section to any public entity for any airport on which general or commercial aviation activities are substantially restricted if the airport is licensed to conduct such activities by the department. The department shall determine whether or not general or commercial aviation activities are restricted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 671, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21683.1.
